Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-156
Application for certificate of authority.

(RULLCA 802) (a) A foreign
limited liability company must apply for a certificate of authority to transact
business in this state by delivering an application and, if applicable, a
current certificate of registration as provided in sections 21-185 to 21-189
and fees to the Secretary of State for filing. The application must state:

(1) the name of the company
and, if the name does not comply with section 21-108, an alternate name adopted
pursuant to subsection (a) of section 21-159;

(2) the name of the state or other
jurisdiction under whose law the company is formed;

(3) the street and mailing addresses
of the company's principal office and, if the law of the jurisdiction under
which the company is formed requires the company to maintain an office in
that jurisdiction, the street and mailing addresses of the required office;
and

(4)
the name and street and mailing addresses and post office box number, if any,
of the company's initial agent for service of process in this state.

(b) A foreign limited
liability company shall deliver with a completed application under subsection
(a) of this section a certificate of existence or a record of similar import
signed by the Secretary of State or other official having custody of the company's
publicly filed records in the state or other jurisdiction under whose law
the company is formed.

Laws 2010, LB888, § 56.